Hawaii statutes.
§342I-2 Lead acid batteries; collection for
recycling. A person selling lead acid batteries at retail or offering lead
acid batteries for retail sale in the State shall:

(1) Accept, at the point of transfer, in a quantity
at least equal to the number of new batteries purchased, used lead acid
batteries from customers, if offered by customers; and

(2) Post written notice that shall be at least five
inches by seven inches in size and shall contain the universal recycling symbol
and the following language:

(A) "It is illegal to discard a motor
vehicle battery or other lead acid battery";

(B) "Recycle your used batteries";

(C) "State law requires us to accept used
motor vehicle batteries or other lead acid batteries for recycling, in exchange
for new batteries purchased"; and

(D) "The price of a new battery includes
disposal of your old battery".

(3) Any advertising pertaining to the price of lead
acid batteries shall include the statement "The price includes disposal of
your old battery".

(4) For businesses utilizing advertising prepared out
of the State a sign no smaller than three square feet, placed at the point of
sale stating: "The price of the battery includes disposal of your old
battery" may be substituted. [L 1989, c 281, pt of §1; am L 1993, c 244,
§2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next